Hawaii statutes.
§46-15.25 Infrastructure dedication;
affordable housing. (a) Infrastructure for affordable housing
shall be deemed dedicated to the county if the county does not accept or reject
the request for dedication of infrastructure within sixty days of the receipt
by the appropriate county council of a completed application for dedication
request; provided that:

(1) Applicable meter and connection fees and utility
costs relating to the dedicated infrastructure have been paid;

(2) The dedicated infrastructure conforms to
applicable county standards in effect at the time of construction; and

(3) The completion of the improvements comprising a
dedicated infrastructure is granted approval by the county.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

"Affordable housing" means housing
that is affordable to households with incomes at or below one hundred forty per
cent of the median family income as determined by the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development.

"Infrastructure" includes water,
drainage, sewer, waste disposal and waste treatment systems, road, and street
lighting that connect to the infrastructure of the county. [L 2009, c 142, §2;
am L 2010, c 26, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next